Maryland, session 2026, HB0775.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
16–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(k) (1) “Pier” means any pier, wharf, dock, walkway, bulkhead, breakwater,
piles, or other similar structure.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0775*

HOUSE BILL 775
(2) “Pier” does not include any structure on pilings or stilts that was
originally constructed beyond the landward boundaries of State or private wetlands.
(l) (1) “Private wetlands” means any land not considered “State wetland”
bordering on or lying beneath tidal waters, which is subject to regular or periodic tidal
action and supports aquatic growth.
(2) “Private wetlands” includes wetlands, transferred by the State by a
valid grant, lease, patent, or grant confirmed by Article 5 of the Maryland Declaration of
Rights, to the extent of the interest transferred.
16–105.1.
(A) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION AND NOTWITHSTANDING
ANY OTHER PROVISION OF THIS TITLE, A PERSON MAY NOT BE REQUIRED TO OBTAIN
PERMISSION FROM THE OWNER OF PRIVATE WETLANDS IN ORDER TO CONSTRUCT A
PIER THAT IS:
(1) WITHIN THE PRIVATE WETLANDS;
(2) CONNECTED TO A LIGHTHOUSE; AND
(3) NOT CONNECTED TO THE SHORE.
(B) A PERSON UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL OBTAIN ALL
NECESSARY APPROVALS FROM THE BOARD AND THE DEPARTMENT PRIOR TO
CONSTRUCTION OF THE PIER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.